Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to  the Oregon Youth Authority, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Facility programs......................  $ 191,806,318
(2) Community programs ...............  $ 80,686,520
(3) Program support.......................  $ 63,405,290
(4) Juvenile crime
prevention/diversion..................  $ 22,502,019
(5) Multnomah County gang
prevention services ................... $ 3,808,146
(6) Debt service .............................. $ 19,999,509
(7) Capital improvements ............... $ 1,732,843
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Youth Authority,
for the following purposes:
(1) Facility programs...................... $ 5,051,582
(2) Community programs ............... $ 2,570,757
(3) Program support ....................... $ 5,542,557
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Youth  Authority, for the
following purposes:
(1) Community programs ............... $ 35,983,223
(2) Program support ....................... $ 2,035,953
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,259,816 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Youth Authority from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5541 (SB 5541-A) Page 1
ministrative Services and transferred to the Oregon  Youth Authority, for capital improve-
ments and the Juvenile Justice Information System upgrade project.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5541 (SB 5541-A) Page 2